Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 150 Fish and Wildlife Resources

150.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrative regulation” means a written regulation promulgated, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, by the commissioner with the approval of the commission;

“Angling” means the taking or attempting to take fish by hook and line in hand, rod in hand, jugging, setline, or sport fishing trotline;

“Buy” includes offering to buy, acquiring, or possessing through purchase, barter, exchange, or trade;

“Cervid” means a hoofed mammal from the family Cervidae, including but not limited to white-tailed deer, mule deer, elk, moose, and caribou;

“Commercial trotline” means a line to which are attached more than fifty (50) single or multibarbed baited hooks, which shall not be placed closer than eighteen (18) inches;

“Commission” means the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;

“Conservation officer” means any member of the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Law Enforcement Division, pursuant to KRS 150.090, who possesses the powers of a peace officer;

“Daylight hours” means the period from one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise to one-half (1/2) hour after sunset;

“Device” means any article, instrument, or equipment of whatever nature or kind which may be used to take wild animals, wild birds, or fishes;

“Department” means the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;

“Fishing” means to take or attempt to take in any manner, whether the fisherman has fish in possession or not;

“Gigging” means the taking of fish by spearing or impaling on any pronged or barbed instrument attached to the end of any rigid object;

“Grabbing” means the taking of fish, frogs, or turtles directly by hand or with the aid of a handled hook;

“Hunting” means to take or attempt to take in any manner, whether the hunter has game in possession or not;

“Identification tag” means a marker made of specified material upon which a name and address or number is placed and attached to unattended gear to designate ownership or responsible operator;

“Impounded waters” means any public waters backed up behind a dam and includes all water upstream from the dam to the first riffle or shoal;

“Jugging” means a means of fishing by which a single baited line is attached to any floating object;

“License” means any document issued by the department authorizing its holder to perform acts authorized by the license and includes any other form of authorization in addition to or in lieu of an actual document which may be authorized by the department by administrative regulation;

“Light geese” means snow geese and Ross’s geese;

“Light geese conservation order” means a wildlife management action needed to control populations of light geese for a period of time established pursuant to 50 C.F.R. sec. 21.60;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

“Migratory shore or upland game birds” means all species of migratory game birds except waterfowl;

“Minnows” means all fish under six (6) inches in length, except basses, either largemouth, smallmouth or Kentucky; rock bass or goggle-eye; trout; crappie; walleye; sauger; pike; members of the striped bass family; and muskellunge;

“Navigable waters” means any waters within this state under lock and dam;

“Nonresident” means a person who has not established a permanent domicile in this state and has not resided in this state for thirty (30) days immediately prior to his or her application for a license;

“Permit” means any document issued by the department authorizing its holder to perform acts authorized by the permit and includes tags or devices as evidence of holding a permit and includes any other form of authorization in addition to or in lieu of an actual document authorized by the department by administrative regulation;

“Possess” means the act of having or taking into control;

“Prescribed by the department” means established by an administrative regulation;

“Processed wildlife” means any wildlife specimen or parts thereof that have been rendered into a permanently preserved state;

“Protected wildlife” means all wildlife except those species declared unprotected by administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

“Public roadway” includes rural roads, highways, bridges, bridge approaches, city streets, viaducts, and bridges which are normally traveled by the general public and are under the jurisdiction of a state, federal, county, or municipal agency;

“Public waters” means all waters within the state flowing in a natural stream channel or impounded on a natural stream;

“Raw fur” means a hide, fur, or pelt of a fur-bearing animal which has not been processed. Skinning, stretching, oiling, or coloring of the pelt of the animal shall not be considered processing;

“Resident” means any person who has established permanent domicile and legal residence and has resided in this state for thirty (30) days immediately prior to his or her application for a license. All other persons shall be classed as nonresidents, except students enrolled for at least six (6) months in an educational institution as full-time students and military personnel of the United States who are under permanent assignment, shall be classified as residents while so enrolled or assigned in this state;

“Resist” means to leave the scene, intimidate or attempt to intimidate in any manner, or further interfere in any manner with any officer in the discharge of his or her duties;

“Rough fish” means all species of fishes other than those species designated by administrative regulation as sport fishes;

“Sell” includes offering to sell, having or possessing for sale, barter, exchange, or trade;

“Setline” means a line to which is attached one (1) single or multibarbed hook. This line may be attached to a tree limb, tree trunk, bank pole, or other stationary object, on the bank of a stream or impoundment;

“Snagging” means the taking of fish or other aquatic animals through the use of a hand-held pole and attached line with single or multiple fish hooks in which the fish is hooked by a rapid drawing motion rather than enticement by bait;

“Sports fishing trotline” means a line to which are attached no more than fifty (50) single or multibarbed baited hooks which shall not be placed closer together than eighteen (18) inches;

“Take” includes pursue, shoot, hunt, wound, catch, kill, trap, snare, or capture wildlife in any way and any lesser act designed to lure, attract, or entice for these purposes; and to place, set, aim, or use any device, animal, substance, or agency which may reasonably be expected to accomplish these acts; or to attempt to do these acts or to assist any other person in the doing of or the attempt to do these acts;

“Tenant” means any resident sharecropper, lessee, or any other person actually engaged in work upon a farm or lands and residing in a dwelling on the farms or lands including noncontiguous lands, but shall not include any other employee or tenant unless actually residing on the property and engaged or employed as above mentioned;

“Transport” means to carry, move, or ship wildlife from one (1) place to another;

“Waterfowl” means all species of wild ducks, geese, swans, mergansers, and coots; and

“Wildlife” means any normally undomesticated animal, alive or dead, including without limitations any wild mammal, bird, fish, reptile, amphibian, or other terrestrial or aquatic life, whether or not possessed in controlled environment, bred, hatched, or born in captivity and including any part, product, egg, or offspring thereof, protected or unprotected by this chapter.

History.
1893d-10, 1954-2: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 1; 1944, ch. 6, § 2; 1944, ch. 124, § 1; 1946, ch. 84, § 1; 1948, ch. 78, § 2; 1952, ch. 200, § 1; 1956, ch. 115, § 1; 1968, ch. 38, § 1; 1972, ch. 273, § 1; 1978, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 365, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 474, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 239, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 512, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 129, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 115, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 167, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 115, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

150.015.
Purpose of 1952 Act amending game and fish laws — Policy of state as to wildlife — Liberal construction — Promotion of hunger relief through wildlife management and conservation.

The declared purpose of Acts 1952, ch. 200, and the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, is to protect and conserve the wildlife of this Commonwealth so as to insure a permanent and continued supply of the wildlife resources of this state for the purpose of furnishing sport and recreation for the present and for the future residents of this state; to promote the general welfare of the Commonwealth; to provide for the prudent taking and disposition of wildlife within reasonable limits, based upon the adequacy of the supply thereof; to protect the food supply of this state, and to insure the continuation of an important part of the commerce of this state which depends upon the existence of its wildlife resources. It is further the declared purpose of Acts 1952, ch. 200, and the policy of this Commonwealth, that an adequate and flexible system be installed to accomplish the aforesaid purposes. All of the provisions of Acts 1952, ch. 200, shall be liberally construed in such manner as most effectually to carry out its purposes and intent.

The commission shall establish a program to promote hunger relief through specific wildlife management and conservation efforts and shall utilize the funds derived from the sources outlined in KRS 150.150(3).

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 78, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 2; 2006, ch. 57, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

150.018.
Department not subject to inclusion within agency by executive order. [Repealed.]

150.020.
Division of Game and Fish; director; commission. [Repealed.]

150.021.
Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources — Assessment of fee for debt service on radio system capital project.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall constitute a department of state government within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12. The department shall consist of a commissioner, a Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission, the Division of Law Enforcement, and other agents and employees provided for in this chapter. The department shall enforce the laws and regulations adopted under this chapter relating to wildlife and shall exercise all powers necessarily incident thereto.

Except with regard to the commission’s authority to appoint and compensate a commissioner under KRS 150.061, any powers conferred by this chapter upon the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, the Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission, or the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, and any powers conferred by KRS Chapter 235 shall be exercised subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 42, 45, 45A, 56, and 64, which chapters in all respects are controlling.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall assess the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources each fiscal year a fee in an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the debt service associated with all phases and implementation of the capital project to replace, repair, or maintain the two (2) way radio system utilized by the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(3) (a)

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall assess the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources each fiscal year a fee in an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the debt service associated with all phases and implementation of the capital project to replace, repair, or maintain the two (2) way radio system utilized by the Department of Kentucky State Police.

The fee shall be assessed on each phase of the implementation of the two (2) way radio system and shall continue to be assessed until all debt for the system has been retired.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1948, ch. 78, § 3; 1952, ch. 200, § 3; 1966, ch. 255, § 143; 1990, ch. 496, § 43, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 118, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 23, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 171, § 10, effective April 13, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 10, effective April 26, 2018; 2021 ch. 161, § 1, effective March 29, 2021.

150.022.
Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission — Definition of “sportsman”.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission shall consist of nine (9) members, one (1) from each wildlife district, as set out by the commissioner with the approval of the commission, and not more than five (5) of the same political party.

The Governor shall appoint the members of the commission subject to confirmation by the Senate. Each of the members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years and may be reappointed only once. No person who has been convicted of a felony offense, in Kentucky or under the law of any other state, or any other law of the United States shall be eligible to serve on the commission.

Vacancies through the expiration of terms of the members of the commission shall be filled by appointment by the Governor from a list of five (5) names from each wildlife district, recommended and submitted by the sportsmen of each respective district. When the term of a member expires, the commissioner shall call a meeting of the sportsmen in that district not later than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of the member’s term. Notice of the meeting shall be given by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. At the meeting, the sportsmen in attendance shall select and submit to the Governor a list of five (5) residents and citizens of the district who are well informed on the subject of wildlife conservation and restoration. Each sportsman may vote for one (1) candidate only, and the list submitted to the Governor shall be made up of the names of the five (5) candidates receiving the five (5) highest vote totals. The Governor shall appoint a successor to the member whose term is about to expire within sixty (60) days following the submission to him of the list referred to in this subsection, and in no event later than August 13.

Upon appointment to the commission of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, each commissioner shall execute a bond of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in favor of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, the premium on this bond to be paid out of department funds.

In the event of vacancies other than by expiration, the Governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired part of the term from the names remaining on the list previously submitted for the district from which the vacancy arose.

Each member of the commission shall take the constitutional oath of office.

The Governor shall remove any member of the commission for cause under subsection (2) of this section and may remove any member of the commission for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office; but shall first deliver to the member a copy of all charges in writing and afford to him an opportunity of being publicly heard in person or by counsel in defense of the charges, upon not less than ten (10) days’ notice. If a member shall be removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges made against the member and his findings thereon, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

Each member of the commission shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred by him in the discharge of his official duties and to be paid from the game and fish fund.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty or for the exercise of any power vested in the commission.

The department shall have its principal office in Franklin County, and is authorized to purchase all supplies, equipment, and printed forms and to issue any notices and publications as the commissioner may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The word “sportsman” as used in this section shall mean a resident hunter or fisherman who has been licensed in Kentucky for each of the past two (2) consecutive years.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 4; 1956, ch. 115, § 2; 1966, ch. 239, § 143; 1978, ch. 178, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 336, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 158, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

150.023.
Meetings and functions of commission.

The members of the commission shall meet in Frankfort, quarterly, upon a date to be determined and fixed by the commissioner, or as often as may be necessary for the transaction of business, upon reasonable notice to each member of such meetings. Committees created by the commission may meet as often as necessary to conduct their assigned business at locations throughout the Commonwealth. Committees must provide public notice of each meeting including date, time, and location information. Public notice shall be provided no less than seven (7) days before the meeting date.

The commission shall at all times keep a watchful eye upon the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, and advise the commissioner to take such action as may be beneficial to the department and in the interest of wildlife and conservation of natural resources.

The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, shall authorize such scientific and other studies as he deems necessary, and shall collect, classify and disseminate such statistics, data and information as in his discretion will tend to promote the objects of this chapter.

The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, shall have the exclusive power to expend for the protection, conservation, propagation and restoration, and taking and harvesting of all wildlife all funds of the state acquired for the protection, conservation, propagation or restoration of all wildlife arising from licenses, gifts or otherwise.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 5; 1956, ch. 115, § 3; 1960, ch. 63, § 25; 1986, ch. 265, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2019 ch. 115, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

150.024.
Power to acquire property — Condemnation.

The department shall have the right to acquire such property as may be necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter, and it shall have the right of eminent domain as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 6; 1976, ch. 140, § 65.

150.0241.
Access to and use of commission-managed lands for hunting — Duties of commission and other state agencies — Reports.

As used in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” has the same meaning as in KRS 150.010;

“Commission-managed lands” means those lands owned by the commission, those lands owned by the Commonwealth over which the commission holds management authority, or those privately owned lands that are leased or managed by the commission; and

“Hunting” means the lawful pursuit, trapping, shooting, capture, collection, or killing of wildlife or the lawful attempt to do the same.

Commission-managed lands shall be open to access and use for hunting except as limited by the commission for reasons of fish or wildlife management, or as otherwise limited by a statute outside KRS Chapter 150 or 235.

The commission, in exercising its authority under the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and statutes, shall exercise its authority consistent with subsection (2) of this section, in a manner that supports, promotes, and enhances hunting opportunities to the extent authorized by law.

Commission land management decisions and actions, including decisions made by private owners to close land managed by the commission, shall not result in any net loss of habitat land acreage available for hunting opportunities on commission-managed lands that exists on July 15, 2010. The commission shall expeditiously find replacement acreage for hunting to compensate for closures of any existing hunting land. Replacement lands shall, to the greatest extent possible, be located within the same wildlife district and shall be consistent with the hunting discipline that the commission allowed on the closed land.

Any state agency that owns or manages lands shall assist and coordinate and cooperate with the commission to allow hunting on these lands if the lands are determined by the commission and that agency to be suitable for hunting. To ensure no net loss of land acreage available for hunting, state agencies shall cooperate with the commission to open new, additional hunting lands to replace lost hunting acreage. Lands officially designated as units within the state park system may be considered for replacement hunting lands and may be open for hunting when necessary as a wildlife control or management tool as determined by the Department of Parks.

By October 1 of each year, the commissioner shall submit to the Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and Environment a written report describing:

The acreage managed by the commission that was closed to hunting during the previous fiscal year and the reasons for the closures; and

The acreage managed by the commission that was opened to hunting to compensate for closures of existing land pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

By October 1 of each year, any state agency that owns or manages lands shall submit a written report to the commission, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and Environment describing:

A list of properties that were open for hunting during the previous fiscal year;

A list of properties that were not open for hunting during the previous fiscal year; and

The acreage for each property and the county where each property is located, including lands on which a right-of-way exists which make the lands unsuitable for hunting, and an explanation of why the right-of-way makes the land unsuitable for hunting; and
(c) 1.

The acreage for each property and the county where each property is located, including lands on which a right-of-way exists which make the lands unsuitable for hunting, and an explanation of why the right-of-way makes the land unsuitable for hunting; and

Parcels under fifty (50) acres. No agency shall subdivide land it owns or manages into parcels under fifty (50) acres in an attempt to avoid compliance with the provisions of this section.

The first report under this section shall be due no later than October 1, 2010.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 158, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

150.025.
Power of department to make administrative regulations as to game and fish, including seasons and limits — Inclusion of administrative regulations on department’s Web site.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter the department may, by administrative regulations promulgated under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A:

Fix, close, terminate, shorten, or divide open season, or make open seasons conditional;

Regulate bag or creel limits and possession limits;

Regulate buying, selling, or transporting;

Regulate the size or type of any device used for taking, and regulate any method of taking;

Regulate or restrict the places where taking is permitted;

Regulate taking, or the opening or closing of seasons, in waters in which the department is conducting experiments or making improvements for the purpose of promoting the conservation of wildlife and increasing the supply thereof;

Make administrative regulations apply to a limited area or to the entire state; and

Promulgate any other administrative regulations reasonably necessary to implement or carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The commissioner shall cause the text of every administrative regulation to be made available electronically on the department’s Web site within five (5) working days of filing. The commissioner shall also cause to be prepared news releases concerning all new or amended administrative regulations for distribution to radio, television, and newspaper media.

This section shall apply to KRS Chapter 150 and no other KRS chapter pertaining to this subject shall apply to KRS Chapter 150.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 78, § 4; 1952, ch. 200, § 7; 1956, ch. 208; 1966, ch. 239, § 144; 1968, ch. 38, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 288, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 127, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 20, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

150.026.
Transfer of property, funds, employes of Division of Game and Fish and preservation of civil service status. [Repealed.]

150.027.
Hearing required before promulgation, amendment, or repeal of administrative regulations affecting property owners or occupants of property adjacent to a lake or other real property owned or controlled by the department.

Not less than sixty (60) days nor more than ninety (90) days prior to the submission of a proposed administrative regulation, proposed amendment to an administrative regulation, or proposed repeal of an administrative regulation to the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee which affects property owners or occupants of property adjacent to any lake or other real property owned or controlled by the department, the department shall:

Hold a public hearing at a time and location most convenient to the public at a location within ten (10) miles of the boundary of the lake so that the public can make comments about the proposed administrative regulation, proposed amendment to an administrative regulation, or proposed repeal of an administrative regulation. Copies of the proposed administrative regulation, proposed amendment to an administrative regulation, or proposed repeal of an administrative regulation shall be distributed to members of the public attending the meeting without cost;

Advertise the hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 424;

Electronically record the hearing and the comments made at the hearing; and

Within thirty (30) days of the close of the hearing, file a statement of consideration with the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee summarizing the comments made at the hearing and the department’s response thereto containing the information required by KRS 13A.010.

The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall find deficient any proposed administrative regulation, proposed amendment to an administrative regulation, or proposed repeal of an administrative regulation covered by this section which does not comply with the provisions of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 158, § 12, effective July 15, 2010.

150.028.
Required administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations regarding:

Specific permitted and prohibited uses of department-owned property and activities on department-owned property;

For a violation of an administrative regulation promulgated under subsection (1), (4), or (5) of this section relating to prohibited uses of department-owned property and prohibited activities thereon, offenses and penalties which do not authorize imprisonment, and for which the offense and the penalty are not established by statute;

The issuance of licenses or permits for the use of and conduct of activities on department-owned property, including but not limited to docks on department-owned lakes;

The revocation or suspension, following a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, of a license or permit issued pursuant to this section; and

Specific permitted and prohibited uses of a department-owned or controlled buffer zone on land adjacent to a department-owned lake, including sanctions which do not authorize imprisonment for violation of the administrative regulations where a statute does not provide an offense and does not provide a penalty.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 158, § 13, effective July 15, 2010.

150.030.
Expenses of commission. [Repealed.]

150.040.
Offices and meetings of commission. [Repealed.]

150.050.
Officers of commission. [Repealed.]

150.060.
Oath and bond of director. [Repealed.]

150.061.
Commissioner — Appointment — Qualifications — Term — Removal — Compensation — Oath — Bond — Duties — Annual report — Authority to appoint additional employees if grant funds available.

Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS Chapter 18A, 42, 45, 45A, 56, or 64 to the contrary, the commission shall have the sole authority to appoint a commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, who shall be a person with knowledge of and experience in the requirements for the protection, conservation and restoration of the wildlife resources of the state. The commission shall be the sole contracting body for the purposes of KRS Chapter 45A and shall submit any proposed personal service contract with a commissioner to the Government Contact Review Committee for its review pursuant to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725. The commissioner shall serve for a defined employment contract term not to exceed four (4) years and shall be subject to:

Annual review by the commission in closed, executive session;

Removal by the commission for the same cause and in the same manner in which the Governor may remove a member of the commission; and

Reappointment by the commission.

The commissioner shall receive such compensation as the commission may solely determine, and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by him or her in the performance of his official duties.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, the commissioner shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office, and shall, in addition thereto, swear or affirm that he or she holds no other public office, nor any position upon or under any political committee or party. Upon appointment by the commission, the commissioner shall execute a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in favor of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, the premium on said bond to be paid out of department funds.

The commissioner shall have general supervision and control of all activities, functions, appointments, and employees of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources. He or she shall enforce all provisions of the laws of the state relating to wild animals, birds, fish and amphibians, and shall exercise all powers necessarily incident thereto not specifically conferred on the commission. The commissioner shall make an annual report of all receipts and disbursements and file same with the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

If federal or other grant funds become available to pay their salaries, the commissioner may appoint and employ other persons that he or she may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The commissioner shall determine the compensation, duties, and terms of employment of these employees, and grant funded, time-limited positions shall be approved by the commission as needed. Employees whose salaries are funded through federal or other grant funds shall not be counted in any tally of permanent employees made for employee cap or budgetary purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 8; 1956, ch. 115, § 4; 1974, ch. 386, § 28; 2003, ch. 170, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 158, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 161, § 2, effective March 29, 2021.

150.065.
Temporary employees.

The commissioner may employ temporarily such other persons as he may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish the duties and functions assigned by law to the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources; may fix the compensation and the terms of employment of those employed; and may assign to them such duties and responsibilities as he may determine.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 439, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

150.070.
Director’s power and duties. [Repealed.]

150.071.
Civil service examinations; regulations pertaining to employes; eligible lists. [Repealed.]

150.072.
Appointments from eligible lists; emergency appointments. [Repealed.]

150.080.
Conservation officers; appointment. [Repealed.]

150.081.
Political activity forbidden.

While retaining the right to vote as he may please and to express privately his opinion of all political subjects and issues, no employee or officer of the department including the commissioner, shall take any active part in political management or political campaigns, nor shall he use his office or influence for the purpose of interfering in any election or affecting the results thereof, or for the purpose of coercing the political action of any body or person or for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing any person in the selection or appointment of a member to the commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 12; 1982, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

150.083.
Suspension, fine, demotion or dismissal of employes; decrease of number of employes. [Repealed.]

150.090.
Commissioner’s power and duty to appoint all conservation officers considered to be necessary for the efficient administration of the department — Each conservation officer is individually vested with the powers of a peace officer in all parts of the state.

The commissioner shall appoint, promote, or take other employment actions to the ranks, grades, and positions of the department conservation officers who are considered by the commissioner to be necessary for the efficient administration of the department.

Conservation officers appointed by the commissioner shall have full powers as peace officers for the enforcement of all of the laws of the Commonwealth, including the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapters 150 and 235 and to serve process.

Each conservation officer is individually vested with the powers of a peace officer and shall have in all parts of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters and enforcement of the laws relating thereto as sheriffs, constables, and police officers in their respective jurisdictions, and shall possess all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables, and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the course of their employment and within the scope of their duties. Any warrant of arrest may be executed by any officer of the department.

Conservation officers charged with the enforcement of this chapter and the administrative regulations issued thereunder shall have the right to go upon the land of any person or persons whether private or public for the purpose of the enforcement of laws or orders of the department relating to game or fish, while in the normal, lawful and peaceful pursuit of such investigation or work or enforcement, may enter upon, cross over, be upon, and remain upon privately owned lands for such purposes, and shall not be subject to arrest for trespass while so engaged or for such cause thereafter. They may arrest on sight, without warrant, any person detected by them in the act of violating any of the provisions of this chapter. They shall have the same rights as sheriffs to require aid in arresting with or without process any person found by them violating any of the provisions of this chapter and may seize without process anything declared by this chapter to be contraband. No liability shall be incurred by any person charged or directed in the enforcement of this chapter.

Conservation officers and other officers charged with the enforcement of this chapter, shall have the authority to call for and inspect the license or tag, bag or creel of any person engaged in any activity for the performance of which a license is required under this chapter, and shall also have the authority to take proper identification of any person, or hunter, or fisherman who is actually engaged in any of these activities, and to call for and inspect any and all firearms and any other device that may be used in taking wildlife and is in the possession of any person so engaged.

No person shall resist, obstruct, interfere with or threaten or attempt to intimidate or in any other manner interfere with any officer in the discharge of his duties under the provisions of this chapter. This subsection shall not apply to a criminal homicide or an assault upon such officer. An assault upon such officer shall be deemed an offense under KRS Chapter 507 or 508, as appropriate.

History.
1954d-9: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 9; 1952, ch. 200, § 14; 1956, ch. 115, § 7; 1968, ch. 38, § 3; 1986, ch. 424, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2019 ch. 167, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

150.091.
Enforcement of KRS 148.795 and 148.796 by conservation officers. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 70, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 16, § 32, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2017 ch. 164, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

150.092.
Consent requirement for entry upon lands of another person — Private lands incentive programs — Arrest and citation authority.

Persons shall not enter upon the lands of another to shoot, hunt, trap, or fish, or for other wildlife-related recreational purposes, without the oral or written permission of the landowner, tenant, or person who has authority to grant permission.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish private lands incentive programs encouraging voluntary access to private lands for hunting, fishing, or other wildlife-related recreation, while at the same time protecting the rights of private property owners. Participation in these programs shall not waive any protection granted to the landowner by KRS 150.645 or 411.190.

A fish and wildlife law enforcement officer may arrest or issue a citation to any person who is in violation of this section or the administrative regulations adopted thereunder.

Persons who enter upon the lands of another to shoot, hunt, trap, or fish, or for other wildlife-related recreational purposes, shall not, through their actions, cause damage to any buildings, fences, crops, livestock or domestic animals, machinery, or other property while upon these lands.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the existing powers of peace officers.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 74, § 2, effective June 16, 1960; 1976, ch. 227, § 3; 1988, ch. 365, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 474, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 250, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

150.095.
Conservation officers may bear arms.

Conservation officers are authorized to keep and bear arms upon their person, concealed or otherwise, in the same manner as all other peace officers, and to exercise the use of such arms to such extent as the same may be necessary in the discharge of their duties.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 15; 1968, ch. 38, § 4; 2019 ch. 115, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.